Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-858
Director; adopt rules and regulations; notice to current licensees.

(1) The director shall adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations for commercial feed and pet food as are specifically authorized in the Commercial Feed Act and such other reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary for the efficient enforcement of the act. In the interest of uniformity, the director shall adopt and promulgate as rules and regulations, unless he or she determines that they are inconsistent with the act or are not appropriate to conditions which exist in this state, the following:

(a) The Official Definitions of Feed Ingredients and Official Feed Terms adopted by the Association of American Feed Control Officials and published in the official publication of that organization; and

(b) Any regulation relating to commercial feed adopted and promulgated pursuant to the authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.

(2) The Administrative Procedure Act shall apply to the Commercial Feed Act, except that it shall be the duty of the department to provide adequate notice to all persons holding a valid license issued pursuant to section 54-850 of any proposed rule or regulation, amendment to a rule or regulation, or intent to repeal an existing rule or regulation.

Laws 1986, LB 322, § 12;

Laws 1992, LB 366, § 19.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.